New Mexico, session 2026, HB268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the cultural affairs department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to conduct a study on the feasibility and cost of creating a museum of land grants and acequias in the state that contemplates the purchase, lease or contracted use of land or buildings significant to land grants and acequias, including the Mercedes Unidas center, or locating the museum in the city of Santa Fe or the city of Albuquerque. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -